src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON GOLBMALOGIGAVCCI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
gávcci+Num+Sg+Nom:#logi#gávcci K ;
gávcci+Num+Ess:#logi#gávcci%>n K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#gávcci K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#gávcci K ;
gávcci+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#gávcci NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#gávcci%>s K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#gávcci%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#gákcá%>j K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#gávcci K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#gávcci K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#gávcci%>t K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#gávcci%>jde K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#gávcci%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGIGAVCCI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
gávcci+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#gávcci K ;
gávcci+Num+Ess:#logi#gávcci%>n K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#gávcci K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#gávcci K ;
gávcci+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#gávcci NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#gávcci%>s K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#gávcci%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#gákcá%>j K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#gávcci K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#gávcci K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#gávcci%>t K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#gávcci%>jde K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#gávcci%>jguin K ;


LEXICON GUOKTELOGIGAVCCI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
gávcci+Num+Sg+Nom:e#logi#gávcci K ;
gávcci+Num+Ess:e#logi#gávcci%>n K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Acc:e#logi#gávcci K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Gen:e#logi#gávcci K ;
gávcci+Num+Cmp/SgGen:e#logi#gávcci NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc:e#logi#gávcci%>s K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e#logi#gávcci%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill:e#logi#gákcá%>j K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#logi#gávcci K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#logi#gávcci K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Nom:e#logi#gávcci%>t K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Acc:e#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Gen:e#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:e#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:e#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill:e#logi#gávcci%>jde K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Com:e#logi#gávcci%>jguin K ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGIGAVCCI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
gávcci+Num+Sg+Nom:ihtta#logi#gávcci K ;
gávcci+Num+Ess:htta#logi#gávcci%>n K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Acc:htta#logi#gávcci K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Gen:htta#logi#gávcci K ;
gávcci+Num+Cmp/SgGen:htta#logi#gávcci NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc:htta#logi#gávcci%>s K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:htta#logi#gávcci%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill:htta#logi#gákcá%>j K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#gávcci K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta#logi#gávcci K ;
gávcci+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Nom:htta#logi#gávcci%>t K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Acc:htta#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Gen:htta#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:htta#logi#gávcci%>X5jd K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Ill:htta#logi#gávcci%>jde K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#gávcci%>jn K ;
gávcci+Num+Pl+Com:htta#logi#gávcci%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GOLBMALOGIOVCCI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
ovcci+Num+Sg+Nom:#logi#ovcci K ;
ovcci+Num+Ess:#logi#ovcci%>n K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#ovcci K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#ovcci K ;
ovcci+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#ovcci NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#ovcci%>s K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#ovcci%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
ovcci+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#okcá%>j K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#ovcci K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#ovcci K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#ovcci%>t K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#ovcci%>jde K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#ovcci%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGIOVCCI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
ovcci+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#ovcci K ;
ovcci+Num+Ess:#logi#ovcci%>n K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#ovcci K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#ovcci K ;
ovcci+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#ovcci NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#ovcci%>s K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#ovcci%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
ovcci+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#okcá%>j K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#ovcci K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#ovcci K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#ovcci%>t K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#ovcci%>jde K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#ovcci%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GUOKTELOGIOVCCI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
ovcci+Num+Sg+Nom:e#logi#ovcci K ;
ovcci+Num+Ess:e#logi#ovcci%>n K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Acc:e#logi#ovcci K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Gen:e#logi#ovcci K ;
ovcci+Num+Cmp/SgGen:e#logi#ovcci NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc:e#logi#ovcci%>s K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e#logi#ovcci%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
ovcci+Num+Sg+Ill:e#logi#okcá%>j K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#logi#ovcci K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#logi#ovcci K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Nom:e#logi#ovcci%>t K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Acc:e#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Gen:e#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:e#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:e#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Ill:e#logi#ovcci%>jde K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Com:e#logi#ovcci%>jguin K ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGIOVCCI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
ovcci+Num+Sg+Nom:ihtta#logi#ovcci K ;
ovcci+Num+Ess:htta#logi#ovcci%>n K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Acc:htta#logi#ovcci K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Gen:htta#logi#ovcci K ;
ovcci+Num+Cmp/SgGen:htta#logi#ovcci NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc:htta#logi#ovcci%>s K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:htta#logi#ovcci%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
ovcci+Num+Sg+Ill:htta#logi#okcá%>j K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#ovcci K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta#logi#ovcci K ;
ovcci+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Nom:htta#logi#ovcci%>t K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Acc:htta#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Gen:htta#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:htta#logi#ovcci%>X5jd K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Ill:htta#logi#ovcci%>jde K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#ovcci%>jn K ;
ovcci+Num+Pl+Com:htta#logi#ovcci%>jguin K ;

LEXICON 21TO99   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
guoktelogi:guok't GUOKTELOGIGAVCCI ;
guoktelogi:guok't GUOKTELOGIOVCCI ;
golbmalogi:golbma GOLBMALOGIGAVCCI ;
golbmalogi:golbma GOLBMALOGIOVCCI ;
njealljelogi:njeallj GUOKTELOGIGAVCCI ;
njealljelogi:njeallj GUOKTELOGIOVCCI ;
vihttalogi:vi VIHTTALOGIGAVCCI ;
vihttalogi:vi VIHTTALOGIOVCCI ;
guhttalogi:gu VIHTTALOGIGAVCCI ;
guhttalogi:gu VIHTTALOGIOVCCI ;
čiežalogi:čieža GOLBMALOGIGAVCCI ;
giežalogi:gieža GOLBMALOGIGAVCCI ;
čiežalogi:čieža GOLBMALOGIOVCCI ;
giežalogi:gieža GOLBMALOGIOVCCI ;
gávccilogi:gávcci GAVCCILOGIGAVCCI ;
gávccilogi:gávcci GAVCCILOGIOVCCI ;
ovccilogi:ovcci GAVCCILOGIGAVCCI ;
ovccilogi:ovcci GAVCCILOGIOVCCI ;
